Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1807
Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the manufacture, production, wholesale selling, or retail selling of American Indian arts and crafts to:

(1) Sell or offer for sale any products as being authentic American Indian arts and crafts unless such products are made in accordance with the definition of authentic American Indian arts and crafts in the American Indian Arts and Crafts Sales Act;

(2) Sell or offer for sale any authentic American Indian arts and crafts purporting to be made of silver unless such products are made of coin silver or sterling silver;

(3) Sell or offer for sale any imitation American Indian arts and crafts unless such products are clearly designated as such by a tag attached to each product and containing the words Indian imitation in letters of a size of not less than fourteen-point type, except that if the imitation American Indian arts and crafts can be clearly labeled by the use of a display card in lieu of tagging each article, the person may label such arts and crafts with a printed display card in letters not less than one and one-half inches in height and containing the words Indian imitation;

(4) Sell or offer for sale spin-cast components of American Indian jewelry, except findings, or use such spin-cast components in jewelry unless such jewelry is stamped as being so cast in its manufacture; or

(5) Sell or offer for sale unnatural turquoise unless represented by a display card or tag as being unnatural turquoise.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 7.